Vermont, session 2025-2026, H112.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. STATE TREASURER; MEDICAL DEBT RELIEF;
APPROPRIATION
(a) The sum of $1,000,000.00 is appropriated to the State Treasurer from
the General Fund in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of contracting with a
VT LEG #379996 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.112
2025 Page 3 of 6
nonprofit entity to acquire and repay certain medical debts incurred by
Vermont residents as set forth in this section.
(b) The State Treasurer shall ensure that the entity with which the Treasurer
contracts under this section will:
(1) purchase the medical debt of eligible debtors from health care
providers at fair market value;
(2) abolish the debt with no cost or tax consequences for the debtor; and
(3) coordinate with the health care provider or collections agency to
ensure that any adverse information resulting from the medical debt is removed
from the debtor’s consumer credit report following the contractor’s purchase
and abolition of the debt.
(c) In order to be eligible for repayment of medical debt under this section,
the following conditions must be met:
(1) the debtor shall be a Vermont resident who either has a household
income that is at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty level for the
applicable household size or who owes medical debt in an amount that is five
percent or more of the debtor’s household income; and
(2) the debtor’s patient account still maintains an outstanding balance
even after the health care provider has completed its routine efforts to collect
the amounts due.
VT LEG #379996 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.112
2025 Page 4 of 6
Sec. 2. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 83, Sec. 53(b)(5)(B), as amended by 2022
Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. C.102 and 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78,
Sec. E.1000, is further amended to read:
(B) $20,000,000 $19,000,000 shall be appropriated to the State
Treasurer’s Office and used for redeeming State of Vermont general obligation
bonds prior to maturity.
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. § 2466d is added to read:
§ 2466d. REPORTING OF MEDICAL DEBT INFORMATION
PROHIBITED
A credit reporting agency shall not report or maintain in the file on a
consumer information relating to a medical debt, as defined in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9481.
Sec. 4. 9 V.S.A. § 2480b is amended to read:
§ 2480b. DISCLOSURES TO CONSUMERS
* * *
(c) Any time a credit reporting agency is required to make a written
disclosure to consumers pursuant to 15 U.S.C. § 1681g, it shall disclose, in at
least 12-point type, and in bold type as indicated, the following notice:
“NOTICE TO VERMONT CONSUMERS
* * *
VT LEG #379996 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.112
2025 Page 5 of 6
(2) Under Vermont law, no one may access your credit report without
your permission except under the following limited circumstances:
* * *
(F) where the request for a credit report is related to a credit
transaction entered into prior to January 1, 1993; or
(G) where the request for a credit report is by the Vermont
Department of Taxes and is used for the purpose of collecting or investigating
delinquent taxes; or
(H) where the request for a credit report is by an organization that is
exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code
for the purpose of determining eligibility for the abolition of medical debt.
* * *
Sec. 5. 9 V.S.A. § 2480g is amended to read:
§ 2480g. EXEMPTIONS
* * *
(e) The provisions of section 2480e of this title shall not apply to an
organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code when determining eligibility for the abolition of
medical debt.
VT LEG #379996 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.112
2025 Page 6 of 6
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. chapter 221, subchapter 10 is amended to read:
Subchapter 10. Patient Financial Assistance and Medical Debt
* * *
§ 9485. PROHIBITION ON SALE OR REPORTING OF MEDICAL DEBT
(a)(1) No large health care facility shall sell its medical debt except as
provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(2) A large health care facility may sell or otherwise transfer its medical
debt to an organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code for the specific purpose of the tax-exempt
organization abolishing the medical debt of one or more patients by
cancellation of the indebtedness.
(b) No large health care facility or medical debt collector shall report or
otherwise furnish any portion of a medical debt to a credit reporting agency.
* * *
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379996 v.1